North Carolina, session 2025, HB1042.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-278.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-278.6. Real and personal property used for charitable purposes.purposes by certain
entities.
(a) Real and personal property owned by:by an entity listed in this subsection is exempt
from taxation if (i) as to real property, it is actually and exclusively occupied and used and, as to
personal property, it is entirely and completely used by the owner for a charitable purpose; and
(ii) the owner is not organized or operated for profit. The entities are:
(1) A Young Men's Christian Association or similar organization;organization.
(2) A home for the aged, sick, or infirm;infirm.
(3) An orphanage or similar home;home.
(4) A Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals;Animals.
(5) A reformatory or correctional institution;institution.
(6) A monastery, convent, or nunnery;nunnery.
(7) A nonprofit, life-saving, first aid, or rescue squad organization;organization.
(8) A nonprofit organization providing housing for individuals or families with
low or moderate incomesincomes, other than rental housing. This subdivision
does not apply to rental housing, which must qualify under G.S. 105-278.7A
to be eligible for an exemption.
shall be exempted from taxation if: (i) As to real property, it is actually and exclusively occupied
and used, and as to personal property, it is entirely and completely used, by the owner for
charitable purposes; and (ii) the owner is not organized or operated for profit.
(b) A charitable purpose within the meaning of this section is one that has humane and
philanthropic objectives; it is an activity that benefits humanity or a significant rather than limited
segment of the community without expectation of pecuniary profit or reward. The humane
treatment of animals is also a charitable purpose.
(c) The fact that a building or facility is incidentally available to and patronized by the
general public, so long as there is no material amount of business or patronage with the general
public, shall does not defeat the exemption granted by this section.
(d) Notwithstanding the exclusive-use exclusive use requirements of this section, if part
of a property that otherwise meets the section's requirements is used for a purpose that would
require exemption under subsection (a), above, if the entire property were so used, the valuation
of the part so used shall be exempted is exempt from taxation.
*H1042-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Real property held by an organization described in subdivision (a)(8) for a charitable
purpose under this section as a future site for housing housing, other than affordable rental
housing as defined in G.S. 105-278.7A, for individuals or families with low or moderate incomes
may be classified under this section for no more than 10 five years. The taxes that would
otherwise be due on real property exempt under this subsection shall be are a lien on the property
as provided in G.S. 105-355(a). The taxes shall be are carried forward in the records of the taxing
unit as deferred taxes. The deferred taxes are due and payable in accordance with
G.S. 105-277.1F when the property loses its eligibility for deferral as a result of a disqualifying
event. A disqualifying event occurs when the property was is not used for low- or
moderate-income housing within 10 five years from the first day of the fiscal year the property
was classified under this subsection. In addition to the provisions in G.S. 105-277.1F, all liens
arising under this subdivision are extinguished when the property is used for low- or
moderate-income housing within the time period allowed under this subsection."
SECTION 2. Article 12 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
the following new section to read:
"§ 105-278.7A. Real and personal property owned, in whole or in part, by a charitable
nonprofit and used for affordable rental housing.
(a) Exemption Generally. – Real and personal property owned by an eligible owner and
used for a charitable purpose in the operation of affordable rental housing is exempt from taxation
to the extent provided in this section if the requirements of this section are met.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Affiliate. – Defined in G.S. 105-130.2.
(2) Affordable rental housing. – A rental housing development consisting of land
and improvements in which more than fifty percent (50%) of the units are
qualifying units.
(3) Charitable purpose. – A charitable purpose within the meaning of this section
is one that has humane and philanthropic objectives; it is an activity that
benefits humanity or a significant rather than limited segment of the
community without expectation of pecuniary profit or reward.
(4) Eligible joint venture. – A limited partnership, limited liability company, or
limited liability partnership in which a general partner or limited liability
company managing member is an eligible nonprofit corporation.
(5) Eligible nonprofit corporation. – A nonprofit described in section 501(c)(3) of
the Code that (i) is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(a)
of the Code, (ii) is incorporated under a certificate of existence or admitted
under a certificate of authority under the North Carolina Nonprofit
Corporation Act as provided in Chapter 55A of the General Statutes, and (iii)
has day-to-day control of the operations of and decisions for the affordable
rental housing and has not delegated any decision-making authority other than
to a property manager serving under the direction of the eligible owner. The
term includes a single-purpose entity wholly owned by an eligible nonprofit
corporation.
(6) Eligible owner. – An eligible joint venture or an eligible nonprofit corporation.
(7) Income limit. – Eighty percent (80%) of area median income, adjusted for
family size, as set and published by the U.S. Department of Housing and
Urban Development as of January 1 of the year the application was submitted
under this section.
(8) Public agency. – Any of the following agencies, if overseeing a program listed
in sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section:
a. A county government.
b. A municipal government.
Page 2 House Bill 1042-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. A housing authority.
d. A State agency or department.
e. A federal agency or department.
(9) Qualifying unit. – An affordable rental housing unit for which both of the
following conditions are met:
a. The rent charged for an occupied unit or the published rent for a vacant
unit is at or below the rent limit.
b. It is occupied by, or set aside for, a tenant whose income is at or below
the income limit.
(10) Rent limit. – Rent, plus a utility allowance calculated in accordance with the
requirements of the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency, that does not
exceed thirty percent (30%) of the income limit.
(c) Requirements for Government-Supported Affordable Rental Housing. – Real and
personal property that provides government-supported affordable rental housing is exempt from
property taxation in any year in which all of the conditions listed in this subsection are met. For
purposes of this section, the term "government-supported" means that the property is financed as
described in sub-subdivision a. or b. of subdivision (2) of this subsection. The conditions are:
(1) The property is owned and operated by an eligible nonprofit corporation or an
eligible joint venture.
(2) Either of the following applies:
a. The eligible owner is an eligible joint venture that receives
low-income housing credits pursuant to section 42 of the Code and
that is in compliance with any applicable regulatory requirements as
determined by the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.
Ownership is determined as of the date the certificate of occupancy is
issued.
b. The eligible owner finances the acquisition, rehabilitation,
development, or operation of the property, or any combination thereof,
with tax-exempt mortgage revenue bonds, qualified 501(c)(3) bonds,
federal direct loans or grants, State loans or grants, or loans or grants
provided by a local jurisdiction in which the property is located. Such
government support must require the execution of a deed restriction or
an enforceable, verifiable regulatory agreement with a public agency
requiring that the property be operated as affordable rental housing in
accordance with this section for a period of at least 15 years from the
date the financing or financial assistance was initially provided. If the
public agency is a municipal government, a housing authority, or a
county government, the deed restrictions or regulatory agreement shall
be recorded with the register of deeds for each county in which the
property is located. The rights of a public agency under the deed
restrictions or regulatory agreement shall endure for the full term of
the agreement and are not defeasible without the written agreement of
the public agency. Government support does not include payments
made to the owner under the federal Housing Choice Voucher
Program or other local, State, or federal voucher program.
(d) Requirements for Non-Government-Supported Affordable Rental Housing. – Real
and personal property that provides non-government-supported affordable rental housing is
exempt from property taxation in any year in which all of the conditions listed in this subsection
are met. For purposes of this subsection, the term "non-government-supported" means that the
property is not financed as described in sub-subdivision a. or b. of subdivision (2) of subsection
(c) of this section. The conditions are:
House Bill 1042-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The property is one hundred percent (100%) owned and operated by an
eligible nonprofit corporation that has owned and operated affordable rental
housing for at least five years. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "one
hundred percent (100%) owned" means (i) the eligible nonprofit corporation
is the sole record owner of the property or (ii) if title to the property is held by
a single-purpose entity, the eligible nonprofit corporation, either directly or
through one or more wholly owned disregarded entities, owns one hundred
percent (100%) of the legal and equitable ownership interest in the
title-holding entity, and no other person or entity holds any membership
interest, partnership interest, shareholder interest, economic interest, profits
interest, capital interest, beneficial interest, or other direct or indirect
ownership interest in that entity.
(2) The eligible nonprofit corporation, including any of its subsidiaries or
nonprofit affiliates, does not receive any funding or financial assistance, other
than grants, from a for-profit affiliate.
(3) The eligible nonprofit corporation does not lease the affordable rental housing
land or improvements to another entity. This subdivision does not apply to the
leasing of affordable rental housing units to tenants.
(4) The eligible nonprofit corporation has executed a deed restriction in favor of
the county and any municipality in which the property is located requiring that
the property be operated as affordable rental housing in accordance with this
section for a period of at least 15 years from the date of application. The
restriction must require that the owner provide the reporting required under
subsection (g) of this section annually to all grantees for the term of the deed
restriction. The deed restriction must state that any grantee, or its assigns, has
the right to enforce the terms of the restriction.
(e) Exemption Amount. – The exemption amount is the percentage of the appraised value
that is equal to the percentage of qualifying units unless the eligible owner meets the requirements
of the safe harbor in Section 3 of Internal Revenue Service Rev. Proc. 96-32, in which case the
exemption amount is one hundred percent (100%) of the appraised value of the property.
(f) Application. – To be eligible for an exemption under this section, an eligible owner
must submit an application in accordance with G.S. 105-282.1. The application form shall require
the applicant to provide the following information:
(1) Whether the applicant is applying for the exemption under subsection (c) or
subsection (d) of this section, along with documentation supporting that the
applicant is an eligible owner for the subsection under which it is applying;
evidence of government support pursuant to sub-subdivision a. or b. of
subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section, if applicable; and a copy of
the applicable deed restriction or regulatory agreement.
(2) Whether the property is subject to a transition period as described in
subsection (e) of this section.
(3) Either of the following, as of the last day of the month immediately preceding
January 1 of the year of application:
a. If the applicant is applying for an exemption amount based on the
percentage of qualifying units, the percentage of qualifying units by
providing the following items:
1. The rent amount received by the owner for each qualifying unit
as evidenced by an anonymized rent roll. The applicant must
provide evidence of the published rent if a unit is vacant.
Page 4 House Bill 1042-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2. The total household income for each occupied qualifying unit,
except during the transition period, evidenced in an
anonymized manner.
b. If the applicant is applying for an exemption amount based on meeting
the requirements of the safe harbor in Section 3 of Internal Revenue
Service Rev. Proc. 96-32, evidence demonstrating the affordable
rental housing meets those requirements.
(4) Certification that the applicant is in compliance with any applicable deed
restriction or regulatory agreement and the requirements of this section.
(g) Compliance. – Pursuant to G.S. 105-282.1, an eligible owner must resubmit an
application annually with the information set forth in subsection (f) of this section to maintain
eligibility. For the first year that verified income eligibility is required, such household income
verification shall have occurred within the previous year. After the initial household income
verification, the household income provided for each qualifying unit must be verified at least
every two years.
(h) Future Site. – Real property held by an eligible owner as a future site for affordable
rental housing may be classified under this section for no more than five years. The taxes that
would otherwise be due on real property exempt under this subsection are a lien on the property
as provided in G.S. 105-355(a). The taxes shall be carried forward in the records of the taxing
unit as deferred taxes. The deferred taxes are due and payable in accordance with
G.S. 105-277.1F when the property loses its eligibility for deferral as a result of a disqualifying
event. A disqualifying event occurs when the property is not used for affordable rental housing
that is in compliance with this section within five years from the first day of the fiscal year the
property was classified under this subsection. In addition to the provisions in G.S. 105-277.1F,
all liens arising under this subsection are extinguished when the property is used for affordable
rental housing within the time period allowed under this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection, the term "future site" means unimproved real property or improved real property that
is not occupied as of the date of the application for exemption under this section.
(i) Ineligible Property. – Property that has been designated a special class of property
under G.S. 105-277.16 and assessed accordingly is not eligible for exemption under this section
unless a new Low-Income Housing Credit Allocation and Certification has been awarded for
newly financed improvements at the property and unless separately applied for and qualified
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section."
SECTION 3. G.S. 105-277.1F(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Scope. – This section applies to the following deferred tax programs:
(1) G.S. 105-275(12), real property owned by a nonprofit corporation held as a
protected natural area.
(1a) G.S. 105-275(29a), historic district property held as future site of historic
structure.
(2) G.S. 105-277.1B, the property tax homestead circuit breaker.
(2a) (See note for repeal) G.S. 105-277.1D, the inventory property tax deferral.
(3) G.S. 105-277.4(c), present-use value property.
(4) G.S. 105-277.14, working waterfront property.
(4a) G.S. 105-277.15, wildlife conservation land.
(4b) G.S. 105-277.15A, site infrastructure land.
(5) G.S. 105-278(b), historic property.
(6) G.S. 105-278.6(e), nonprofit property held as future site of low- or
moderate-income housing.housing, other than affordable rental housing as
defined under G.S. 105-278.7A.
(7) G.S. 105-278.7A(h), nonprofit property held as future site of affordable rental
housing."
House Bill 1042-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2026, and, with respect to property held as a future site under G.S. 105-278.6(e)
or G.S. 105-278.7A(h), as enacted by this act, applies to real property classified under those
provisions on or after that date. Notwithstanding G.S. 105-282.1(a)(2)a., an owner of low- or
moderate-income rental housing property that is exempt under G.S. 105-278.6(a)(8) as of the
effective date of this act must, by December 31, 2026, reapply for the exemption, providing the
assessor of the taxing unit with any necessary documentation for compliance consistent with this
act. Reapplication under this section is considered an application under G.S. 105-278.7A(f), as
enacted by this act. Failure to meet this requirement within the time limit subjects the property
to discovery under G.S. 105-312.
Page 6 House Bill 1042-Second Edition